Ohio, session 136, HB998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. The Tax Commissioner shall reimburse county auditors for the cost of implementing recent property tax changes. An amount sufficient to make these reimbursements is hereby appropriated in fiscal year 2027 from the General Revenue Fund. Section 2. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.